Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4317
(UDTA 17) Uniformity of application and construction.

(UDTA 17) In applying and construing the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 17.